Utah statutes.
76-9-106.   Disrupting the operation of a school.
(1)  A person is guilty of disrupting the operation of a school if the person,
after being asked to leave by a school official, remains on school property
for the purpose of encouraging or creating an unreasonable and substantial
disruption or risk of disruption of a class, activity, program, or other
function of a public or private school.
(2)  For purposes of this section, "school property" includes property being
used by a public or private school for a school function.
(3)  Disrupting the operation of a school is a class B misdemeanor.
